Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.045

Application for grain dealer license.

Application for a license to operate as a grain dealer under the provisions of this chapter shall be on a form prescribed by the department and shall include:

(1) The full name of the person applying for the license and whether the applicant is an individual, partnership, association, corporation, or other entity;

(2) The full name of each member of the firm or partnership, or the names of the officers of the company, society, cooperative association, or corporation;

(3) The principal business address of the applicant in the state and elsewhere;

(4) The name or names of the person or persons in this state authorized to receive and accept service of summons and legal notices of all kinds for the applicant;

(5) Whether the applicant has also applied for or has been issued a warehouse license under this chapter;

(6) The location of each business location from which the applicant intends to operate as a grain dealer in the state of Washington whether or not the business location is physically within the state of Washington, and the location of the headquarters or main office of the application;

(7) A financial statement to determine the net worth of the applicant to determine whether or not the applicant meets the minimum net worth requirements established by the director under chapter 34.05 RCW. However, if the applicant is a subsidiary of a larger company, corporation, society, or cooperative association, both the parent company and the subsidiary company must submit a financial statement to determine whether or not the applicant meets the minimum net worth requirements established by the director under chapter 34.05 RCW. All financial statement information required by this subsection shall be confidential information not subject to public disclosure;

(8) Whether the applicant has previously been denied a grain dealer or warehouse operator license or whether the applicant has had either license suspended or revoked by the department;

(9) Any other reasonable information the department finds necessary to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter.

[ 2011 c 336 s 601; 1987 c 393 s 18; 1983 c 305 s 21.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.